Utah statutes.
31A-26-201.   Requirement of license.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no person may perform, offer to
perform, or solicit the opportunity to perform any act of insurance adjusting
without a valid license under Section 31A-26-203; and no person may use the
insurance adjusting services of another if the person knows or should know
that the one providing these services does not have a license as required by
law.
(2)  The following are exempt from the license requirement of Subsection (1),
when acting in the indicated capacities:
(a)  a person engaged in insurance adjusting as a regular salaried employee
of, and not an independent contractor for, an insurer;
(b)  an arbitrator or an umpire selected by the claimant and insurer to
decide, alone or with others, whether a claim should be paid and how much
should be paid;
(c)  an attorney at law acting in an attorney-client relationship;
(d)  an insurance producer, but only as to the classes of insurance for which
he is licensed under Section 31A-23a-106 and only as to claims adjusted on the
request of an insurer for which he is a producer;
(e)  a regular salaried employee of, and not an independent contractor for, a
policyholder or claimant under an insurance policy;
(f)  an employee of a licensed insurance adjuster who provides only
administrative or clerical assistance;
(g)  person who does not do insurance adjusting under Section 31A-26-102, but
who is specially employed to obtain facts about a loss for or furnish
technical assistance to a licensed adjuster or a company adjuster, including a
photographer, estimator or appraiser, marine surveyor, private detective,
engineer, and handwriting expert;
(h)  a holder of a group insurance policy, with respect to administrative
activities in connection with that policy, who receives no compensation for
his services beyond the actual expenses estimated on a reasonable basis;
(i)  a person engaged in insurance adjusting as a regular salaried employee
of, and not an independent contractor for, an administrator licensed under
Chapter 25; and
(j)  a person who gives advice or assistance without compensation or
expectation of compensation, direct or indirect.
(3)  No claim settlement between an insurer and an insured or a claimant under
an insurance contract is invalid as a result of a violation of this section.
